District of Columbia statutes.
5-131.04

Applicable statutory provisions; transfer of moneys from Civil Service Retirement and Disability Fund.

The person who is the Director of the Metropolitan Police Force band shall, upon his retirement from such position, be retired under the provisions of this subchapter and not under subchapter III of Chapter 83 of Title 5, United States Code, and the moneys to his credit in the Civil Service Retirement and Disability Fund created under the authority of such subchapter, on the date of such retirement, together with such moneys in such Fund as may have been contributed by the District of Columbia toward the cost of his annuity under such subchapter, shall be transferred to the credit of the general revenues of the District of Columbia.

History

July 11, 1947, ch. 226, § 4
Sept. 22, 1959, 73 Stat. 641, Pub. L. 86-356
Aug. 29, 1972, 86 Stat. 642, Pub. L. 92-410, title II, § 202(b)

Cross References

Merit system, application to police officers and firefighters, see § 1-632.03.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-632.03.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-182.
1973 Ed., § 4-183b.

References in Text

“Subchapter III of Chapter 83 of Title 5, United States Code” is codified at 5 U.S.C. §§ 8331 to 8351.